District of Columbia statutes.
47-2885.17a

Public place defined.

For the purposes of § 47-2885.17, the term “public place” means any street, sidewalk, bridge, alley, plaza, park, driveway, parking lot, transportation facility, or the doorways and entrance ways to any building which fronts on any of these locations, or a motor vehicle in or on any such place.

History

Dec. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 4-57, § 2(2), 28 DCR 4652
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2017.1.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.

Editor's Notes

The phrase “§ 47-2885.17” was substituted for “this act” near the beginning of this section for clarity. The act referred to was D.C. Law 4-57.